Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RICE LAKE; SEWER AND WATER INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $3,800,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for one or more grants to the city of Rice Lake to design and construct the following capital projects to provide safe drinking water for residents, support development in the area, and prepare for anticipated road reconstruction: new text end new text begin (1) an extension of water infrastructure along Martin Road, between Stavenger Road and Howard Gnesen Road; new text end new text begin (2) an extension of sewer and water infrastructure along a new frontage road between Martin Road and West Calvary Road; and new text end new text begin (3) an extension of sewer infrastructure near the intersection of Martin Road and Rice Lake Road. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $3,800,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end